Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3990
Cream for buttermaking; pasteurization.

Cream for buttermaking shall be pasteurized at a temperature of not less than one hundred sixty-five degrees Fahrenheit and held continuously in a vat at such temperature for not less than thirty minutes, or at a temperature of not less than one hundred eighty-five degrees Fahrenheit for not less than fifteen seconds, or any other temperature and holding time approved by the director that will assure pasteurization and comparable keeping-quality characteristics.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 24, p. 84;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.110;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 35;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 26;

Laws 1993, LB 268, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3935;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 26.